Maryland, session 2026, HB1342.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
2–2103.
(a) There is an Urban Agriculture Water and Power Infrastructure Grant Fund.
(b) The purpose of the Fund is to provide grants to urban agricultural producers
and qualified nonprofit organizations for the purchase and installation of:
(1) Agriculture equipment associated with water supply and irrigation;
and
(2) Electric power access.
(c) The Secretary shall administer the Fund.
(d) (1) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of
the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately, and the
Comptroller shall account for the Fund.
(e) The Fund consists of:
(1) Money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund;
(2) Money appropriated to the Fund under § 13–209 of the Tax – Property
Article; and
(3) Any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit of the
Fund.
(f) The Fund may be used only for:
(1) Providing up to 87.5% of matching funds to urban agricultural
producers [and], qualified nonprofit organizations, AND CONTROLLED–ENVIRONMENT
OR HYDROPONIC FARMERS for the purchase and installation of:

HOUSE BILL 1342
(i) Water meters;
(ii) Water pipes;
(iii) Irrigation hoses;
(iv) Electric meters;
(v) Electrical lines; or
(vi) Any other equipment associated with water supply and irrigation
or electric power access the Department determines is appropriate; and
(2) Administrative costs for the Department to administer the Program.
(g) On or before October 15 each year, beginning in 2024, the Department shall
submit a report to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee and the House Appropriations
Committee on the effectiveness of the funding provided under this section.
SUBTITLE 25. CONTROLLED–ENVIRONMENT AND HYDROPONIC AGRICULTURE.
2–2501.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH A ONE–STOP PORTAL TO SERVE
AS A CENTRALIZED INFORMATION SOURCE FOR INDIVIDUALS INTERESTED IN
CONTROLLED–ENVIRONMENT OR HYDROPONIC AGRICULTURE.
(B) (1) THE PORTAL SHALL BE IN A CONSPICUOUS LOCATION ON THE
DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE WITH RESOURCES AND FREQUENTLY ASKED QUESTIONS
ABOUT PERMITTING AND LICENSING CONTROLLED–ENVIRONMENT OR
HYDROPONIC AGRICULTURE IN THE STATE.
(2) THE PORTAL SHALL INCLUDE CONTACT INFORMATION FOR AN
INDIVIDUAL IN THE DEPARTMENT WHO CAN ASSIST THE INDIVIDUAL.
2–2502.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FUND” MEANS THE MARYLAND
CONTROLLED–ENVIRONMENT AND HYDROPONIC AGRICULTURE PROGRAM FUND.
(B) THERE IS A MARYLAND CONTROLLED–ENVIRONMENT AND
HYDROPONIC AGRICULTURE PROGRAM FUND.

HOUSE BILL 1342 5
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO ADVANCE
CONTROLLED–ENVIRONMENT AND HYDROPONIC AGRICULTURE IN THE STATE.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(E) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
AND
(2) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(G) THE FUND MAY PROVIDE FOR UP TO FIVE GRANTS ANNUALLY THAT MAY
BE USED ONLY FOR:
(1) THE CAPITAL COSTS OR OPERATING COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH
ESTABLISHING, EXPANDING, AND MAINTAINING A CONTROLLED–ENVIRONMENT OR
HYDROPONIC AGRICULTURE FACILITY; OR
(2) THE COST OF TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE OR CONSULTING FEES
ASSOCIATED WITH ESTABLISHING, EXPANDING, OR MAINTAINING A
CONTROLLED–ENVIRONMENT OR HYDROPONIC AGRICULTURE FACILITY.
(H) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
(I) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(J) FOR FISCAL YEARS 2028 AND 2029, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN
THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $5,000,000 TO THE FUND.
Article – Economic Development

HOUSE BILL 1342
3–401.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the Partnership for Workforce Quality Advisory Board.
(c) “Fund” means the Partnership for Workforce Quality Fund.
(d) “Program” means the Partnership for Workforce Quality Program.
3–402.
There is a Partnership for Workforce Quality Program in the Department.
3–403.
The purpose of the Program is to provide training services to:
(1) improve the competitiveness and productivity of the State’s workforce
and business community;
(2) upgrade employee skills, or train new employees, for new technologies
or production processes; and
(3) assist employers located in the State in promoting employment
stability.
3–404.
(a) The Secretary or the Secretary’s designee shall direct the Program.
(b) (1) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE Secretary may not provide training assistance under the Program
except at the specific request of an employer or group of employers.
(2) ON REQUEST, THE SECRETARY SHALL PROVIDE TRAINING
ASSISTANCE TO COMMUNITY COLLEGES FOR THE CONTROLLED–ENVIRONMENT
AND HYDROPONIC AGRICULTURE WORKFORCE TRAINING INITIATIVE UNDER §
3–413 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(c) To identify employers that need assistance, the Secretary shall use local
advisory groups, including private industry councils and joint apprenticeship committees.
(d) Subject to §§ 3–405 and 3–412(c) and (d)(1) of this subtitle, the Secretary shall
establish eligibility criteria and priorities for assistance under the Program.

HOUSE BILL 1342 7
(e) In accordance with § 2.5–109 of this article, the Secretary shall submit a report
on the operation and performance of the Program.
3–413.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “INITIATIVE” MEANS THE
CONTROLLED–ENVIRONMENT AND HYDROPONIC AGRICULTURE WORKFORCE
TRAINING INITIATIVE.
(B) THERE IS A CONTROLLED–ENVIRONMENT AND HYDROPONIC
AGRICULTURE WORKFORCE TRAINING INITIATIVE IN THE PROGRAM.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE INITIATIVE IS TO PROVIDE MATCHING GRANTS TO
COMMUNITY COLLEGES IN THE STATE TO DEVELOP CURRICULUM AND COURSE
MATERIALS TO TRAIN AND SUPPORT INDIVIDUALS INVOLVED IN
CONTROLLED–ENVIRONMENT AND HYDROPONIC AGRICULTURE.
(D) ON REQUEST BY A COMMUNITY COLLEGE IN THE STATE THAT HAS
AGREED TO PROVIDE MATCHING FUNDS, THE SECRETARY SHALL PROVIDE
TRAINING ASSISTANCE TO THE COMMUNITY COLLEGE FOR THE INITIATIVE.
Article – Land Use
1–401.
(b) The following provisions of this division apply to a charter county:
(19) § 4–217 (CONTROLLED–ENVIRONMENT AND HYDROPONIC
AGRICULTURE);
[(19)] (20) Title 4, Subtitle 5 (Accessory Dwelling Units);
[(20)] (21) § 5–102(d) (Subdivision regulations – Burial sites);
[(21)] (22) § 5–104 (Major subdivision – Review);
[(22)] (23) Title 7, Subtitle 1 (Development Mechanisms);
[(23)] (24) Title 7, Subtitle 2 (Transfer of Development Rights);
[(24)] (25) except in Montgomery County or Prince George’s County, Title
7, Subtitle 3 (Development Rights and Responsibilities Agreements);
[(25)] (26) Title 7, Subtitle 4 (Inclusionary Zoning);

HOUSE BILL 1342
[(26)] (27) Title 7, Subtitle 5 (Housing Expansion and Affordability);
[(27)] (28) § 8–401 (Conversion of overhead facilities);
[(28)] (29) for Baltimore County only, Title 9, Subtitle 3 (Single–County
Provisions – Baltimore County);
[(29)] (30) for Frederick County only, Title 9, Subtitle 10 (Single–County
Provisions – Frederick County);
[(30)] (31) for Howard County only, Title 9, Subtitle 13 (Single–County
Provisions – Howard County);
[(31)] (32) for Talbot County only, Title 9, Subtitle 18 (Single–County
Provisions – Talbot County); and
[(32)] (33) Title 11, Subtitle 2 (Civil Penalty).
4–217.
THE LEGISLATIVE BODY SHALL ADOPT ZONING REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE
THE FLEXIBILITY TO ALLOW FOR THE INCORPORATION OF
CONTROLLED–ENVIRONMENT AND HYDROPONIC AGRICULTURE IN URBAN AREAS.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
14–701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Certified Chesapeake invasive species” means a finfish species that is:
(1) ranked as high priority in the Maryland Aquatic Nuisance Species
Management Plan; and
(2) harvested from the Chesapeake Bay or its tributaries.
(c) “Certified Chesapeake invasive species provider” means a person licensed and
authorized as a seafood dealer under § 4–701 of the Natural Resources Article that:
(1) is certified by the Department in accordance with regulations adopted
under this subtitle; and
(2) can demonstrate that the person’s product is a certified Chesapeake
invasive species.

HOUSE BILL 1342 9
(d) “Certified local farm” means a local farm enterprise that:
(1) meets the nutrient management requirements established under Title
8, Subtitle 8 of the Agriculture Article; and
(2) is certified by the Department in accordance with regulations adopted
under this subtitle.
(e) “Department” means the Department of Agriculture.
(f) “Office” means the Office for the Certified Local Farm and Fish Program.
(g) “Program” means the Certified Local Farm and Fish Program.
14–702.
(a) (1) There is an Office for the Certified Local Farm and Fish Program in the
Department.
(2) The purpose of the Office is to administer the Program and facilitate
the participation of certified local farms and certified Chesapeake invasive species
providers in the Program.
(b) (1) There is a Certified Local Farm and Fish Program in the Office.
(2) The purpose of the Program is to encourage each unit to try to achieve:
(I) an overall percentage goal of 20% of the unit’s total dollar value
of procurement contracts for food from certified local farms and certified Chesapeake
invasive species providers; AND
(II) AN OVERALL PERCENTAGE GOAL OF THE FOLLOWING
PERCENTAGES OF THE UNIT’S TOTAL DOLLAR VALUE OF PROCUREMENT
CONTRACTS FOR FOOD FROM CERTIFIED LOCAL FARMS THAT USE
CONTROLLED–ENVIRONMENT OR HYDROPONIC AGRICULTURE:
1. 1% FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028;
2. 3% FOR FISCAL YEAR 2029; AND
3. 5% FOR FISCAL YEAR 2030 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR
THEREAFTER.
(c) The Department shall create two positions to provide staff for the Office.

HOUSE BILL 1342
(d) The Department, along with the Department of General Services, shall
coordinate with the State Department of Education to procure local food for local school
systems in accordance with § 7–136 of the Education Article.
14–703.
(a) (1) Each unit shall structure procurement procedures, consistent with the
purposes of this subtitle, to try to achieve:
(I) an overall percentage goal of 20% of the unit’s total dollar value
of procurement contracts for food being made directly or indirectly to certified local farms
and certified Chesapeake invasive species providers; AND
(II) AN OVERALL PERCENTAGE GOAL OF THE FOLLOWING
PERCENTAGES OF THE UNIT’S TOTAL DOLLAR VALUE OF PROCUREMENT
CONTRACTS FOR FOOD FROM CERTIFIED LOCAL FARMS THAT USE
CONTROLLED–ENVIRONMENT OR HYDROPONIC AGRICULTURE:
1. 1% FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028;
2. 3% FOR FISCAL YEAR 2029; AND
3. 5% FOR FISCAL YEAR 2030 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR
THEREAFTER.
(2) A unit may achieve the [20% goal] GOALS through:
(i) competitive sealed bids and proposals; and
(ii) small procurement in accordance with § 13–109 of this article.
(3) For procurements conducted by competitive sealed bidding, a unit shall
award the contract to the responsible bidder that submits the responsive bid that:
(i) 1. has the lowest bid price;
2. has the lowest evaluated bid price; or
3. for procurements subject to § 11–202(3) of this article, is
the bid most favorable to the State; and
(ii) meets or makes a good faith effort to meet any applicable goal
established under this subtitle.
(4) For procurements conducted by competitive sealed proposals, a unit
shall award the contract to the responsible offeror:

HOUSE BILL 1342 11
(i) proposing the most advantageous offer; and
(ii) that meets or makes a good faith effort to meet any applicable
goal established under this subtitle.
(b) The Office, in consultation with the Secretary of Agriculture, shall establish
guidelines for each unit to consider when determining the appropriate local farm and
Chesapeake invasive species provider participation percentage goal for a procurement
contract for food in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.
(c) Each unit shall:
(1) consider the practical severability of all procurement contracts for food
and, in accordance with § 11–201 of this article, may not bundle contracts;
(2) implement a program that will enable the unit to evaluate each
procurement contract for food to determine the appropriate local farm and Chesapeake
invasive species provider participation goals, if any, for the contract based on:
(i) the availability of certified local farms and certified Chesapeake
invasive species providers to respond competitively to contract opportunities; and
(ii) the contract goal guidelines established under subsection (b) of
this section;
(3) monitor and collect data with respect to a unit’s compliance with
contract goals, including explanations for failing to meet contract goals; and
(4) institute corrective action when a unit does not make good faith efforts
to comply with contract goals.
(d) The Office shall, in consultation with the Secretary of Agriculture, establish
procedures governing how the participation of certified local farms and certified
Chesapeake invasive species providers is counted toward contract goals under the Program.
(e) (1) (i) If a unit does not achieve the certified local farm and certified
Chesapeake invasive species provider participation goals on a procurement contract for
food, the unit shall demonstrate to the Office that the unit took all necessary and
reasonable steps to achieve the goals.
(ii) A waiver of any part of the certified local farm and certified
Chesapeake invasive species provider goals for a procurement contract for food shall be
granted if a unit provides to the Office a reasonable demonstration of good faith efforts to
achieve the goals.

HOUSE BILL 1342
(2) The Office may waive any of the requirements of this subsection
relating to the establishment, use, and waiver of certified local farm and certified
Chesapeake invasive species provider goals for a sole source, expedited, or emergency
procurement in which the public interest cannot reasonably accommodate use of those
requirements.
(3) Except for waivers granted in accordance with paragraph (2) of this
subsection, when a waiver determination is made, the Office shall issue the determination
in writing.
(4) On or before October 31 each year, the Office shall submit directly to
the Board an annual report of waivers requested and waivers granted under this
subsection.
(5) The report required under paragraph (4) of this subsection shall contain
the following information on those procurement contracts for food where the Office
considered a unit’s request for waiver of all or a portion of the local farm and Chesapeake
invasive species provider goals:
(i) the contract titles, numbers, and dates;
(ii) the number of waiver requests received;
(iii) the number of waiver requests granted; and
(iv) any other information specifically requested by the Board.
(f) The Board shall keep a record of information regarding any waivers requested
in accordance with this section and submit a copy of the record to the Senate Committee on
Education, Energy, and the Environment and the House Health and Government
Operations Committee on or before December 31 each year, in accordance with § 2–1257 of
the State Government Article.
Article – Tax – Property
13–209.
(g) (3) (i) 3. For each [of fiscal years 2024, 2025, 2026, and 2027]
FISCAL YEAR, the Governor shall include in the annual budget bill a General Fund
appropriation of [$500,000] $1,000,000 to the Urban Agriculture Water and Power
Infrastructure Grant Fund established under § 2–2103 of the Agriculture Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.